ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/en_US/hyph_en_US.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.3
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
1's./'=s,1,2
1't./'=t,1,2
1’s./’=s,1,2
1’t./’=t,1,2
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.ar3abil
.ara1b2i
.ar3a3bl2
.ar1am
.a2r3d
.a2r1s
.ar1um
.ar1oi
.arch4e
.ar3cher
.ar1i1e
.arthri3t4i1d
.ar1t2hr
.ar4t3i2s2t.
.ar1tis
.ar4t3i2s2ts
.art3in
.ar1te
.ar1ty
.ar1li
.ar1le
.ar1g
.ar4gua
.ar1gu
.ar3mis2
.ar1my
.ar1q
.ad2d3in
.a2d1d2
.ad2d3ed
.ad3opt1ed
.1adop
.ado2pt
.a1di1o
.ad1en
.ad1l
.a1v1a1r
.av3i2d.
.av3e2r.
.av3e2ns
.aveng3er
.ak2i
.as2k
.as1s
.as4s1e2s.
.ash1i
.as1ta
.as1to
.as1te
.as1p
.aus1
.au1ge
.aor1
.an3do
.an1de
.an1kl
.a2nk
.a2n1s
.an1c
.an1il
.an1im
.an1er
.an3tr
.an3t2e.
.an3t2ed
.an3tes
.ant1l
.an1g
.an2y1
.ab1al2
.a1b1ie
.ab1er
.ac1ra
.acr2
.ac3ron
.ac3ro1m
.a4ch
.2ac2h3r
.ach3in
.ach2e
.acu1i3ty
.acui2
.ace3t2i
.act3ab
.a2ct
.ac3ti
.air1i
.ai3res
.ais2
.ai1la
.ae1ri
.ae1d
.a1f1a
.a2f1f
.af1t
.at1ar
.a1t1ra
.atro1
.at3rop
.ath3e2ns
.atom1
.a1to
.at3o2m.
.at3o2ms
.at3o1py
.at2i
.ateli2
.at3ele
.al1an
.al1d
.a2l1v
.al3u2m.
.al1oe
.al3ic4e
.al1i1p
.al1t
.al1tim3
.al1le
.al1me
.2alm
.al1y
.ag1at
.ag3n2
.2ag2l
.am3a1r
.am3ani
.am1at
.a2m1o3ro
.am3ide
.am1it
.am1e1t
.am1pe
.ay2
.aw1ni
.ap1a1t
.ap3rop
.a4ph
.aph3o1
.apo3li
.aqui1
.aq3uil
.axo1
.ax1
.r2
.rav1a
.ra3ve2n.
.rav3e2n3o2
.rav3eni
.rav3ene
.ras1t
.ra1ni
.ra2c3is
.r2aci
.ra2cie
.raf3ter
.rafte2
.ratio3n4
.ra1tio
.rat3er
.rag3g
.ra1me
.raw1l
.ra1ph
.rap3is2
.ru1ti
.rug3g
.rov3er
.ro2san
.ro1sa
.ros1i
.ros3es
.ros1t
.ro2n
.ro1bl2
.roll3in2
.rol1li
.roll3er
.rog3a1to
.rog1e
.ro1mu
.row1d
.ro2p
.rop1i
.ro2q
.ri1va
.ri1be
.ri2tal1
.ri1ta
.rit1u
.ril1i
.ri2ma
.re3a2d1m
.reali3za1t
.1re1al
.real1iz
.re1r2
.re1du
.2red
.re1va
.res3er1va
.re3s3tat
.res4ta
.re1u
.re1na
.re1ni
.ren2t3
.re3co2n.
.rec3og
.re2i2n.
.re1in1
.re1es
.re1en
.re1ec
.re1em
.re3fer1a
.re2t3in
.re1te
.re3late
.rel3ic
.re3mis
.re1w
.re1press4
.repres3s3i3b
.re1pi
.d2
.dart3e
.dad2di
.1dad
.da2d1d2
.da3na
.dan1t
.da1m3an
.dur4
.du1ra
.dura3b
.du3ria
.du1re
.d1u2ca
.du1c2e
.dul2l
.do2v
.do3ver
.dos3es
.1do3ne
.dol1i
.do1mi3n4i1u
.dia3r4i
.di1ar
.dia3ry
.di1an
.diagno3ses
.di1ag
.diag1n2
.di3v2es
.1dive
.di1o
.dic3es
.di1er1
.dil3a1tat
.de1r1a
.dev3i2l
.1de3sc
.des2ce
.de3sta
.de3n1er
.dec3o1ro
.1dec
.def4i
.de3led
.del3le
.dem3oi
.de2war
.de1wa
.de4po1si1tio
.de1p
.de1pos
.dy2s
.dwin1
.d1wi
.dz1
.v2
.var2ia
.1var
.var3ies
.va3l1is
.va3lin
.va2les
.va1p
.vo1li
.vom1
.v2i1a1b
.vi1al
.vi1d2u
.1vi3d2e.
.vid3eo
.vi1va
.1v2iv
.vin3ci3
.vi1er
.vi2ent
.vi1en
.ve1r1a
.ver2ie
.vend3er
.ven3ue
.ven3ter
.ve1lo
.k2
.kro3
.kr2
.kes1
.s2
.sa1ri
.1s2ak2
.sa1b2l2
.2sab
.sa3lin
.salt3e
.sh2
.shov3er
.sh1in3g2
.su1ri
.1su
.sobriet3i
.so3br2
.sobri1e2t
.so4lu
.sol3ute
.so1lut
.soph3i2s2t.
.sophi2st
.soph3i2s2ts
.scal3i
.s1ca
.sci1o
.1s2ci1e
.s4ce
.si1al
.1sia
.sin3g2l
.2s1ing
.si3gno
.4sign3ee
.3signe
.1se3r2a.
.ser1a
.se3rie
.s2eri
.sev3er1a
.1sev
.sev3er1in
.sev3e2red
.ses1
.sen1a
.se3n2e.
.se1li
.1self1
.sell3i
.sell3e
.se2mar
.sta3bl2
.st4roph3i
.stroph2
.stud3ie
.1stud
.st4i
.ste3r4o
.st4e3ric
.sla3ve2r.
.s2lav
.sla3ve2rs
.slan3d
.smal2
.spou3sa
.spi2t
.spi1t3a
.spe2c3t
.h2
.har3pie
.har3py1
.ha1de
.ha3ve2r.
.ha3v3e2n.
.ha3bi3tan
.h2abit
.habi1ta
.ha3bil
.ha3lon
.haz3i
.hus1s
.ho4r
.hor4a
.ho2rac
.hov1
.hos3es
.hoo3si2
.hon3ey
.ho1lo
.ho3lis
.ho3ga
.hill3in2g.
.hillin2
.hilli4ng
.heat3e
.hea2
.hea2t
.he3ros
.her3on
.her3es
.hes1
.heu1
.hen1d
.he2c
.he1c1a
.he2i
.he1is2
.het1
.u2
.u2r1s
.u2r3b
.ur1c
.u4ri
.ure1t
.us1a
.ush1
.us1q
.un1
.u2nd2
.uni1f
.un2i
.un3t4
.unte4
.u4tr
.ul1t
.u1ma1
.up1
.upa1
.o2
.o4ra
.or3a1to
.ora3le
.or1d
.ordinar4il
.ordinar2
.or1d2i1na
.ordi1nari
.or1n
.or1c
.o4ri
.ori1f
.or3ifi
.or3e1go
.or1t
.od2
.o2d1d3
.odd1e
.odon4tol
.odon1to
.ov2er
.ov3e2n.
.os1
.os2a
.os2i2
.osmo3ses
.os1m
.os1mos
.out1
.oo1d
.ooz1i
.oo1ph
.oo1pl2
.on1o
.on1y
.o1c1a1
.oc1r2
.och2e
.oi1t
.oe1d
.oe1so
.oes1t
.of3te2
.oth1
.ot2o
.old1
.ol3iv
.ole3an
.om1in
.om1el
.om1p
.n2
.na1ri
.2na1re
.na1d
.na1k
.na1c
.na1te
.na1zi
.na1po
.na3per
.n2u1c
.nucle1o3t
.nucle1
.nu1cl
.null3in2
.n2os1i
.nos3es
.no2n2a.
.1no1e
.no3men
.now2
.ni2c
.ni1ca1
.ni1ti
.ni1te
.ne1al
.nev3i2l
.nest3e
.neis3
.nem3ati
.b2
.bar3ite
.bar3et
.ba3tho
.bal3as
.1bala
.ba2li
.ball3in2
.bus3ses
.buss2
.bust3e
.bun3ker
.bunk4e
.bu2nk
.but2t3i
.bu2t1t2
.but4t3ed
.bon3ie
.1bon
.bo1lu
.bo3l2e.
.bi1a2
.bi1va
.bios3es
.bi1ose
.bi3nat
.3bina
.bit3er
.be1r2a
.be2t3t2
.bell3in2
.1bel
.3bell
.b1less3
.bl2
.c2
.car3at
.1ca
.car3ol
.car3ie
.can3ter
.ca2t1i
.camp3er
.capa3b
.ca1pa
.ca3pe2r.
.ca3pe2rs
.crat4
.cr2
.cra3ter
.craw3ly
.1cre3ti
.charg4
.char3ger
.chant3e2r.
.chant3e2rs
.2ch2ab
.chap3e2l.
.chro4nol
.c2hr
.chro1no
.cho3li
.ch4i
.1chi1o
.chill3in2
.ch2e
.ches3te2r
.che2s
.chem3ist
.cur2v2y
.cur1v
.cu3te2s.
.cork3e2
.cor3ner
.count3er2s.
.counte2rs
.coot2
.co3nat
.consu1l3a
.1co2ns
.con1su2
.col1lin3e
.col1li
.collin2
.cogniz4
.cog1ni
.c4ogni3za
.cogni4z1a3b
.combat3a
.1co2m1b
.comba2t
.cop3ied
.1copie
.cop3ies
.co3p2y.
.1copy
.ci1d
.1cis1
.ci1o
.cin1d
.ci2ti
.ci1t3ie
.c1i2ty
.ce3res
.ce2n1s2
.cel1a2
.cl4in3a
.1cl
.i2
.i1at1
.ir3r
.ir2i
.ir2t
.ideo3g
.i4dl
.ivo1
.isoto3pi
.iso1to
.iso1top2
.is2i
.is1e
.io1d2
.in1
.i2n2k
.ink1i
.ino1s
.i4n2i
.3in3iq
.2ic1in
.ic1ie
.ic1es
.if3
.ita2l3i
.i1ta
.it2i
.il1i
.il1li
.ig1
.imagi2n3ab
.i2mag
.imag1i
.imag1in
.i2m3b
.im1ita3b
.im1it
.imi1ta
.im3m2
.im3pe
.iza1
.ip1
.e2
.ear3li
.eas1i
.eas3t4e2r.
.east1e
.eas3t4e2rs
.eat1e
.ea2t
.eal1
.ea1g
.er2a
.er2r1i
.er1r
.er1v
.er3ogeni
.ero1gen
.er1ni
.er1ic
.e1d1is
.ed3it1in
.ed3ite
.edg3er
.ev3a2n.
.evil3l4
.evi2l
.e1v3er1b
.ev3ere
.ek1i
.es1
.2esh1
.espe1
.eu1
.eo1
.en1an
.enam1
.e2n1s
.en1ur
.en1c
.en1t
.en3ta
.en1g
.e1b1o
.e2b2b
.ebb1i
.e2c3lam
.e1cl
.ei1d
.ei1st
.ei3t
.ei1l
.ee1r2
.e4th
.eth3ane
.2etha
.el1d
.el1vi
.e2lv
.el3ver
.elv2e
.e1l1io
.el1ig
.el1em
.el1ep
.el2f1
.el1t
.el1li
.el3m
.eg1l
.eg2g
.egg1i
.eg2m
.e1m1al
.em1in
.em1ig2
.ew1i
.ep1a
.eq3u2it
.equ2
.fa3mes
.1fa
.fro3zen
.1fr
.fri2c1
.fu1t
.1fu
.full3e2r.
.full3e2s
.for2m3al1d
.1f2o
.f2orm
.for1ma
.form4e
.for3m3e2r.
.fian3
.1fi1a
.f2ianc2
.fi3des
.1fid
.fix2es
.1fix1
.fe1r2a
.fes3t
.fe2b
.f4ec
.fell3er
.flag3ellat
.1fl
.flagel1la
.t2
.ta2r1d
.tav1
.tast3er
.ta3ni2s.
.ta3bu1l2a.
.ta4bu
.tabu1la
.ta3bli
.tabl2
.ta3b2l2e.
.ta3bles
.tach2e
.tail2e
.talk3e
.ta3lio
.tal2e
.ta3ler
.tall3e
.tam3per
.4tamp
.tran3spira
.tra2ns
.tracta3b
.trac3ta
.tra2ct
.troll3in2
.trol1li
.troll3er
.tro3ph2
.3trop3ic
.tri1d
.tric3es
.t4rice
.tri3p4lin
.trip3li
.tr2ipl2
.trea3tie
.trea2t
.trea3ty
.th2
.tho2m
.tu3ri2n.
.1turi
.1tu1i3
.tu1te
.1tut
.tu1le
.tu1me
.to1ri
.to1re
.tou3ch2e.
.to1no
.to1ny
.1to2e
.tol2l
.tol1l3i
.toll3er
.to3war
.top3ic
.ti2n1k
.1t2i1ni1
.tin3g2l
.ti1ny
.ti2t3i
.til1i
.till4e
.til3ler
.ti2m
.te3red
.termi3na
.1term2i
.ter1m
.termi2na3b
.tes3te2r
.1teste
.ten3an
.te4n1a3b
.ten3der
.1tend
.tel1a
.tell3i
.tell3e
.ty3ra3m
.ty1l
.l2
.lar1e
.la3ver
.last3e
.lan2d
.land3er
.la1bi
.la2c1i
.la2cy
.la4t1in
.2la1t3i2n.
.lat3i2ns
.la1ge
.la1ma
.la4me
.lu1e
.lute3al
.lu1tea
.lu1tz
.l2o3ric
.lo1re
.lov3er
.lou3re
.lo1cu
.lo1is
.loi1t
.lo1t2i
.li1a
.li1a3na
.l2i1a1b
.lis2ti
.lis4ter
.list3e2r.
.lis4t3e2rs
.li1o
.li3nar
.l4ina
.lint3er
.l2in3ge
.li4ng
.lif3er
.l1i2ta
.li1t2c
.li3t2e.
.l2ite
.li3te2r.
.li3tes
.limi2n
.lim1i
.limi1n3a
.lim1i4t
.liz1
.leagu3er
.leagu4e
.le1r
.ledg4
.led3ger
.le1va
.le3vis
.le3ver
.1les3te
.le3o2n.
.lend3e
.le2b1
.le2i
.le1ti
.le4gat
.le1ga
.le1g3ate
.leg1r
.le3g2es
.le2ge
.lem1o2
.le2p1
.l4y1s
.g2
.ga2r1d
.ga2boo
.ga1bo
.ga1bl2
.ga2my
.g4ra
.gust3i
.1gus
.gou2t
.go3tha
.1go1p
.gn2om4
.g1no3mic
.gi3an2
.1gia
.gi2b
.ge3ran
.ger1a
.ge4ri
.ge1re
.gent2
.1gen
.gen3tl
.ge2b1
.gell3i
.glan3de
.glotti3d
.1glo
.glo2tt2
.glot1ti
.m2
.ma3ri2a.
.mar3i1n1er
.marin2e
.2mart2
.mar3ti
.mar3te
.mar3ty
.manag3e2r.
.man1age
.man1t
.ma2c3ad
.ma1ca
.matu4r3iti
.1m2atu
.ma1turi
.matu3r2it
.mala4y3an
.mala3ya
.ma1lay
.m4a1li3a
.1ma1q
.mu1ri
.mor3at
.mor3a2l.
.mo1ro
.mo3rin
.mo3res
.mo3ses
.1mos
.mo3sel
.mous3i
.1mous
.mould3e
.mo3na2s.
.mono3l2
.1mono
.mo3nis
.1moni
.mon3ie
.moth3
.mol2d3e
.mi3s4e2r.
.1miser
.mi3se2rs
.mi2nas
.mi1na
.mi2n3ab
.min3ut1ed
.mi2ni
.min3i2s.
.mi3tic
.mi3ter
.migra4t3o2r.
.mig2
.migra1to4
.mi1gr
.mer3c4
.mer1c2u3
.me3r1in
.1me3du
.med3i2c.
.1medi
.1men1t
.m4ma
.m1m2
.y2
.ye1t
.yt1
.w2
.wa3ver
.1wav
.wo3ven
.wild3e2r.
.well3in2g.
.wellin2
.welli4ng
.ja3nis
.1j
.ju1di3c
.ju1di
.z2
.zu1r
.ze1n
.p2
.par3a3bl2
.pav3er
.pan1d
.pa3ca
.pa1ti
.pray2
.prom3is1i
.prom3ise
.3pre2d3a1to
.p2red
.pr2e1da
.pre1dat
.pre4s3en2t.
.pre1sen
.pre4s3en2ts
.prec3at
.pre1c
.2pre1ca
.p1so1
.ph2
.pharynge3a
.1phar
.pha1rynge
.pharyn1g2
.ph4on2i
.3pho3n1ic
.1pho1t2
.pur2r
.purr3i
.pu3b4li3c2a.
.1pub
.pub1li
.publ2
.publi1ca
.put4t3ed
.pu2t1t2
.po1ro
.1por3t2a
.por2ta3b
.port4e
.por3t3er
.pov1e
.pos4t3e2r.
.pos3ter
.pos4t3e2rs
.pon3de
.pi1ra
.pi3sce
.pis1c
.pi2er
.pi2ti
.p2i2ty
.pi1la
.pe2ri
.permea3bi
.per1m
.perm4e
.perme1ab
.ped3a2l.
.2ped
.p2eda
.p4e3nes
.pec1to3
.pe2ct
.pet3al
.1pet
.pe1ti
.pe1te
.py3ret
.qin1
.x2
.xe1
.x2y1
2a.
aar1o
aa1r1b
aa1rem
aa1r1la
aas1
aan1d
aan1i
aa3cs
aa1i
aa1la
aa1li
ar1a2ds
ar3adis
a3radin
a1rade
ar1a1v2
ar1ake
ar1as1c
ara1st
a1rasm
ar1ah
ar1auc
a1rana
a1ra1ni
ar3ante
a1r2ang
ar1a2bs2
ara1b2i
ar1a1be
1ara2c.
a3racas1
ara1ca
ar1a2ct
ar2a1i
ar1ae
ar1a2f1f
ar1a2ts
a4rato2r.
ara1to
4a4r3a1tiv
arat3is
a3ra1tio
a1r2ate
a4rat2en
ar1ald
a1ra2lo
ara1le
ar1all
ara1go
ar3amar
ara1ma
ar1amo
a3ram1e1te
ar1awa
araz1
a4ra1p
ar1ape
ar1ax2y
arax1
arro1g
ar1r
a2rd
ar1dal
ard1re
ardr2
ar4dis
ar1di1u
ar3dine
ard1er
ard1l
arv1er
ar1ko
ark1n
ark1es
ar1kle
ars1n
a2rs
ar1s2c
ar1si
arst1i
ar1h
ar1u2ms
a1r2o.
aro1r
ar3o1dis
ar1o1dy
a4rouse
ar3ousel
a1roo
aron1a
ar1o2ns
aro2n3e
ar1ony
ar1ob
a1ro1c
ar1o2t.
ar1o2ts
aro2t2t2
arot1t3i
arot1t3ed
ar1o2l.
a1r4o1la
ar1ols
ar1oli
ar3ol1li
arol3ler
ar1oly
ar1o2m.
ar3omati2c.
aro1ma
aromat1ic
ar3omati1ca
ar3o3m4ati2cs
ar1o2ms
ar1om3i
a3rom1e1try
a3rom1e1te
1a1rop
a1ro2q
ar1ox1
ar1no
ar1nis
ar1nie
arb4i
ar1b
arb2i1t4
arcas2e
ar1c2a
arch3an
3ar1chis
ar1chy
arco1m
ar1co
arc2i3t
ar1ci
arc3es
ar4i.
a3r2i1asi
ar1i1an
a1ri1ac
ar1i2d.
ar1i2d1n
a1rivo
1a1risk
a1riss
a3rishi
ar1ish
ari1so
ar3ismati
aris1ma
ar1i1h
ar1i1u
ar1iou
ari1o
ar1ion
a1ri3oc
ar1iot
a1ri1ol
ar1i4og
a3ri1n4a.
ari1na
ar3inat
a1ri2ns
a1r2ino
a1rin1i
ar3ing
ar1i2b.
ar1i2bs2
a1ri2b1b
a1ri1be
ar1i1ca
a1ri2cs
ar1ico
a1rici
ar3i3ces
ar3icel
a1r4i2e.
ar2ied
a3ri1e2t
ar4i1el
ar1ieg
ar1if
ari1fi
ar1i1ta
ar1i2ts
ar3i1tie
ar1i2l.
ar1ils
ari1lo
ar1i1j
ar1izo
ar1ip
ar1ix1
ar1e4a.
ar1eas
ar1ean
a1r1e1al
area1w
ar1er2
ar2ero
ar1e1do
a2red
a1ress
a1resi
a1rese
ar1est
a1resq
a1re2u1
are1o
ar1e1ou
ar1eop
ar1e2n.
are3na
ar1end
a1re2ns
a3rench
ar3en2t.
ar3en2ts
a3rentis
aren1ti
ar3en2tin
ar3ente
are1c
a1rei
a1ree
ar1e1fi
ar1e1fy
ar1e2l.
ar1els
ar1ego
ar1ey
are1w
ar1ex1
arf3in
ar2fe
ar2t1ag
ar1ta
ar1tha
ar1t2hr
arth3il
ar3t2i1b
art3i2e.
art3ier
ar1ti1f
ar1tiz
1ar1tee
ar1tli
ar1ty1i2
ar1gh
arg1ee
1ar1gy
armo3niz
ar1mo
ar1moni
armis2
a1ry1b
1ar1yt
1a1ry1m
arp1er
arp1es
arp3e2n.
arpe2n
arp3ene
ar2qu2e.
a1dah2
ad1a2na
ad1ab
a1d1ac
ad1alo
ad1aga
ad1age
ad1a2m.
ad1ama
ad1a2ms
1adami
1a1day
ad1aw
1adap
ad3ran2t.
adr2
ad3ran2ts
ad3r2ang
ad3ra2t.
ad3rate
ad1rap
adru3p
ad1ros
ad3ro2n.
ad3ro2ns
a1drid
ad3riva
ad1ric
ad1rig
ad1rip
ad1r2y.
ad2d3a
a2d1d2
ad1si
a2ds
ad1ha
ad1u1a
adu1r
a1d2uc
aduc2t3a
a1du2ct
ad1u1la
ad1um
ad1o1sp
ado4n
adon1i
a1doc
a2d1of2
ad1ot
ad1o1li
ad1o1le
ad1olf
ad1ow
1adop
